Idaho, session 2025, H0172.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 74-204, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
74-204. NOTICE OF MEETINGS -- AGENDAS. (1) Regular meetings. No less
than a five (5) calendar day meeting notice and a forty-eight (48) hour
agenda notice shall be given unless otherwise provided by statute. Provided
however, that any public agency that holds meetings at regular intervals of
at least once per calendar month scheduled in advance over the course of the
year may satisfy this meeting notice by giving meeting notices at least once
each year of its regular meeting schedule. The notice requirement for meet-
ings and agendas shall be satisfied by posting such notices and agendas in a
prominent place at the principal office of the public agency or, if no such
office exists, at the building where the meeting is to be held. The notice
for meetings and agendas shall also be posted electronically if the entity
maintains an online presence through a website or a social media platform.
(2) Special meetings. No special meeting shall be held without at least
a twenty-four (24) hour meeting and agenda notice, unless an emergency ex-
ists. An emergency is a situation involving injury or damage to persons or
property, or immediate financial loss, or the likelihood of such injury,
damage or loss, when the notice requirements of this section would make such
notice impracticable or increase the likelihood or severity of such injury,
damage or loss, and the reason for the emergency is stated at the outset of
the meeting. The notice required under this section shall include at a min-
imum the meeting date, time, place and name of the public agency calling for
the meeting. The secretary or other designee of each public agency shall
maintain a list of the news media requesting notification of meetings and
shall make a good faith effort to provide advance notification to them of the
time and place of each meeting.
(3) Executive sessions. If only an executive session will be held, a
twenty-four (24) hour meeting and agenda notice shall be given according
to the notice provisions stated in subsection (2) of this section and shall
state the reason and the specific provision of law authorizing the executive
session.
(4) An agenda shall be required for each meeting. The agenda shall be
posted in the same manner as the notice of the meeting. An agenda may be
amended, provided that a good faith effort is made to include, in the orig-
inal agenda notice, all items known to be probable items of discussion. An
agenda item that requires a vote shall be identified on the agenda as an "ac-


tion item" to provide notice that action may be taken on that item. Multiple
agenda items may be grouped together and voted upon as a single action item
known as a consent agenda, provided the agenda items are not ordinances, fee
resolutions, or items requiring more than a simple majority of the members
present. During the meeting, if any member of the governing body requests an
item or items be removed from the consent agenda, such item or items shall,
prior to the vote on the consent agenda, be removed from the consent agenda
and considered as a separate action for discussion and vote. Identifying an
item as an action item on the agenda does not require a vote to be taken on
that item.
(a) If an amendment to an agenda is made after an agenda has been posted
but forty-eight (48) hours or more prior to the start of a regular meet-
ing, or twenty-four (24) hours or more prior to the start of a special
meeting, then the agenda is amended upon the posting of the amended
agenda.
(b) If an amendment to an agenda is proposed after an agenda has been
posted and less than forty-eight (48) hours prior to a regular meeting
or less than twenty-four (24) hours prior to a special meeting but prior
to the start of the meeting, the proposed amended agenda shall be posted
but shall not become effective until a motion is made at the meeting and
the governing body votes to amend the agenda.
(c) An agenda may be amended after the start of a meeting upon a motion
that states the reason for the amendment and states the good faith rea-
son the agenda item was not included in the original agenda posting. Fi-
nal action may not be taken on an agenda item added after the start of
a meeting unless an emergency is declared necessitating action at that
meeting. The declaration and justification shall be reflected in the
minutes.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.